en: Installation fabrication level: Advanced fabrication (welding/cutting); Bolt-on (minimal modification); Moderate modification (minor brackets/holes); Professional installation recommended; Other
es: Nivel de fabricación de la instalación: Fabricación avanzada (soldadura/corte); Atornillable (modificación mínima); Modificación moderada (soportes/agujeros menores); Se recomienda instalación profesional; Otro
cs: Úroveň provedení instalace: Pokročilá montáž (svařování/řezání); Šroubovací (minimální úpravy); Mírné úpravy (drobné držáky/otvory); Doporučuje se odborná montáž; Jiné
de: Erforderlicher Anpassungsaufwand bei der Installation: Komplexe Verarbeitung (Schweißen/Schneiden); Aufschraubbar (minimale Modifikation); Moderate Modifikation (kleinere Halterungen/Löcher); Professionelle Installation empfohlen; Sonstige
ja: 設置製作レベル: 高度な加工 (溶接/切断); ボルトオン (最小限の加工); 中程度の加工 (軽微なブラケット/穴あけ); 専門業者による取り付けを推奨; その他
lt-LT: Montavimo pritaikymo lygis: Pažangus pritaikymas (virinimas / pjovimas); Prisukamas (minimalios modifikacijos); Vidutinė modifikacija (nedideli laikikliai / skylės); Rekomenduojamas profesionalus montavimas; Kita
nb: Fabrikasjonsnivå for montering: Avansert tilpasning (sveising/kutting); Bolt-on (minimal modifikasjon); Moderat modifikasjon (mindre braketter/hull); Profesjonell installasjon anbefales; Annet
el: Επίπεδο κατασκευής εγκατάστασης: Προηγμένη κατασκευή (συγκόλληση/κοπή); Με βίδες (ελάχιστη τροποποίηση); Μέτρια τροποποίηση (μικρά στηρίγματα/οπές); Συνιστάται επαγγελματική εγκατάσταση; Άλλο
sl-SI: Stopnja predelave za namestitev: Napredna obdelava (varjenje/rezanje); Pritrditev z vijaki (minimalne spremembe); Zmerne spremembe (manjši nosilci/luknje); Priporočljiva strokovna vgradnja; Drugo
fr: Niveau d’adaptation requis pour l’installation: Fabrication avancée (soudage/découpage); À visser (modification minimale); Modification modérée (supports/trous mineurs); Installation professionnelle recommandée; Autre
sk-SK: Úroveň montážneho vyhotovenia: Pokročilé úpravy (zváranie/rezanie); Montáž skrutkami (minimálne úpravy); Mierne úpravy (drobné konzoly/diery); Odporúča sa odborná montáž; Iné
nl: Installatie fabricageniveau: Geavanceerde fabricage (lassen/snijden); Bolt-on (minimale aanpassing); Gemiddelde aanpassing (kleine beugels/gaten); Professionele installatie aanbevolen; Overige
ro-RO: Nivelul de fabricație al instalației: Modificare avansată (sudură/tăiere); Cu șuruburi (modificare minimă); Modificare moderată (suporturi/găuri minore); Instalare profesională recomandată; Altele
pt-PT: Nível de fabrico da instalação: Fabrico avançado (soldadura/corte); Aparafusado (modificação mínima); Modificação moderada (pequenos suportes/orifícios); Instalação profissional recomendada; Outro
hr-HR: Razina izrade instalacije: Napredna obrada (zavarivanje/rezanje); Na vijke (minimalne preinake); Umjerene preinake (manji nosači / otvori); Preporučuje se profesionalna montaža; Ostalo
pl: Poziom prac adaptacyjnych przy montażu: Zaawansowana przeróbka (spawanie/cięcie); Przykręcane (minimalne modyfikacje); Umiarkowane modyfikacje (drobne wsporniki/otwory); Zalecany montaż przez profesjonalistę; Inny
fi: Asennuksen valmistustaso: Edistynyt asennus (hitsaus/leikkaus); Pultattava (vähäinen muokkaus); Kohtalainen muokkaus (pienet kiinnikkeet/reiät); Ammattimaista asennusta suositellaan; Muu
pt-BR: Instalação nível de fabricação: Fabricação avançada (soldagem/corte); Parafusado (modificação mínima); Modificação moderada (suportes menores/furos); Recomenda-se instalação profissional; Outro
zh-TW: 安裝加工程度: 進階加工 (焊接/切割); 螺栓固定 (最少修改); 中度修改 (小型支架/孔洞); 建議由專業人員安裝; 其他
hu: Telepítési gyártási szint: Haladó szintű szerelés (hegesztés/vágás); Rácsavarozható (minimális módosítás); Közepes módosítás (kisebb tartók/furatok); Szakember általi beszerelés ajánlott; Egyéb
tr: Kurulum imalat seviyesi: İleri düzey imalat (kaynak/kesme); Cıvatalı (minimum modifikasyon); Orta düzey modifikasyon (küçük braketler/delikler); Profesyonel kurulum önerilir; Diğer
ru: Уровень доработки при установке: Сложная доработка (сварка/резка); Болтовое соединение (минимальные изменения); Умеренная доработка (мелкие кронштейны/отверстия); Рекомендуется профессиональная установка; Другое
bg-BG: Ниво на изработка на монтажа: Сложна обработка (заваряване/рязане); Монтаж с болтове (минимални модификации); Умерени модификации (малки скоби/отвори); Препоръчва се професионален монтаж; Други
ko: 설치 제작 수준: 고급 제작(용접/절단); 볼트 체결(최소한의 수정); 보통 수준의 수정(부분적 브래킷/구멍); 전문가 설치 권장; 기타
vi: Mức độ chế tạo khi lắp đặt: Chế tạo nâng cao (hàn/cắt); Gắn bu-lông (ít phải sửa đổi); Sửa đổi vừa phải (giá đỡ/lỗ nhỏ); Nên nhờ thợ chuyên nghiệp lắp đặt; Khác
zh-CN: 安装制作等级: 高级加工（焊接/切割）; 螺栓固定（最小程度改装）; 中度改装（轻微支架/开孔）; 建议由专业人员安装; 其他
it: Livello di fabbricazione dell'installazione: Fabbricazione avanzata (saldatura/taglio); Imbullonata (modifiche minime); Modifica moderata (staffe/fori minori); Installazione professionale consigliata; Altro
da: Installations- og fremstillingsniveau: Avanceret tilpasning (svejsning/skæring); Fastskruning (minimal modifikation); Moderat modifikation (mindre beslag/huller); Professionel installation anbefales; Andet
sv: Tillverkningsgrad för installation: Avancerad modifiering (svetsning/kapning); Bultas fast (minimal modifiering); Måttlig modifiering (mindre fästen/hål); Professionell installation rekommenderas; Övrigt
th: ระดับการผลิตเพื่อการติดตั้ง: การประกอบขั้นสูง (การเชื่อม/การตัด); ขันน็อต (ดัดแปลงน้อยที่สุด); การดัดแปลงระดับปานกลาง (ฉากยึด/รูเล็กน้อย); แนะนำให้ติดตั้งโดยผู้เชี่ยวชาญ; อื่นๆ